Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 Section 4, chapter 370, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  [ Sections 1 and 3  of this 2023 Act are ] Section 3, chapter 370, Oregon Laws 2023, is
repealed on July 1, 2024.
SECTION 2. Section 1, chapter 370, Oregon Laws 2023, is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 22, 2024
Repassed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4059 (HB 4059-B) Page 1